Illinois, session 104th, SB1535.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Straw 5Purchaser Accountability Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. In this Act, "gun trafficking" 7means a violation or attempted violation of any of the 8following Sections or subsections of the Criminal Code of 92012:10        (1) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 11    firearms);12        (2) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);13        (3) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);14        (4) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 15    firearms on the premises of any school);16        (5) Section 24-3.4 (unlawful sale of firearms by 17    liquor licensee); or18        (6) subsection (b) or (c) of Section 24-3.5 (unlawful 19    purchase of a firearm).  20    Section 10. Cause of action. Whenever any person engages 21in gun trafficking or intentionally or negligently delivers or 22causes to be delivered a firearm, firearm ammunition, or a   SB1535- 2 -LRB104 06317 RLC 16352 b1laser sight accessory, firearm silencer, or muffler to:2        (1) any person who is not legally authorized to 3    possess that item;4        (2) a person who is purchasing the item on behalf of 5    another person; or6        (3) any other person the deliverer knows or has reason 7    to know will use the item unlawfully; 8the deliverer shall thereafter be civilly liable for the 9commission of any subsequent tortious conduct that directly or 10indirectly involves the use, attempted use, or threatened use 11of the item by any person. 12    Section 15. Relief. A prevailing plaintiff shall be 13entitled to all relief that would make him or her whole. This 14includes, but is not limited to: 15        (1) declaratory relief;16        (2) injunctive relief;17        (3) recovery of costs and attorney's fees including, 18    but not limited to, costs for expert testimony and witness 19    fees;20        (4) compensatory damages including, but not limited 21    to:22            (A) economic loss, including damage, destruction, 23        or loss of use of personal property, loss of past of 24        future earning capacity; and25            (B) damages for death, personal injury, and mental   SB1535- 3 -LRB104 06317 RLC 16352 b1        and emotional harm, including medical, rehabilitation, 2        burial expenses, pain and suffering, and physical 3        impairments; and4        (5) punitive damages if the conduct of the defendant 5    that gave rise to the cause of action was either 6    intentional, reckless, or grossly negligent. 7    Section 20. Joint and several liability. Persons subject 8to liability under this Act are jointly and severally liable. 9    Section 25. Double recovery prohibited. Any person who 10recovers damages under this Act may not recover the same costs 11or damages under any other Act. A person who recovers damages 12under any other Act may not recover for the same costs or 13damages under this Act.  14    Section 30. Statute of limitations. Any action based upon 15or arising under this Act shall be commenced within 5 years 16after the date of the alleged violation or within 5 years after 17the date the plaintiff discovers or through the use of 18reasonable diligence should have discovered the alleged 19violation. The limitation periods in this Section do not begin 20to run before the plaintiff attains the age of 18 years; and, 21if at the time the plaintiff attains the age of 18 years he or 22she is under other legal disability, the limitation periods 23under this Section do not begin to run until the removal of the   SB1535- 4 -LRB104 06317 RLC 16352 b1disability. 2    Section 35. Standard of proof. The standard of proof in 3any action brought under this Act is a preponderance of the 4evidence. 5    Section 40. Evidence. Relating to a cause of action under 6this Act, the fact that a plaintiff or other witness has 7testified under oath or given evidence relating to an act that 8may be a violation of any provision of the Criminal Code of 92012 shall not be construed to require the State's Attorney to 10criminally charge any person for the violation.  11    Section 45. Stay of proceedings. The State's Attorney of 12the county where the acts giving rise to the cause of action 13occurred may move for a stay of any proceeding brought under 14this Act, including all discovery, pending the completion of 15an investigation or prosecution of a criminal case related to 16the subject matter of a suit brought under this Act. 17    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 18severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.